Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 162, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 13.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 13.1. A. Persons convicted of:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2151 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. First degree murder as provided for in Section 701.7 of this
title;
2. Second degree murder as provided for in Section 701.8 of
this title;
3. Manslaughter in the first degree as provided for in Section
711 of this title;
4. Poisoning with intent to kill as provided for in Section 651
of this title;
5. Shooting with intent to kill, use of a vehicle to facilitate
use of a firearm, crossbow, or other weapon, assault, battery, or
assault and battery with a deadly weapon or by other means likely to
produce death or great bodily harm, as provided for in Sections 644
and 652 of this title;
6. Assault with intent to kill as provided for in Section 653
of this title;
7. Conjoint robbery as provided for in Section 800 of this
title;
8. Robbery with a dangerous weapon as provided for in Section
801 of this title;
9. First degree robbery as provided for in Section 797 of this
title;
10. First degree rape as provided for in Section 1111 or 1114
of this title;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2151 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

11. First degree arson as provided for in Section 1401 of this
title;
12. First degree burglary as provided for in Section 1431 of
this title;
13. Bombing as provided for in Section 1767.1 of this title;
14. Any crime against a child as provided for in Section 843.5
of this title;
15. Forcible sodomy as provided for in Section 888 of this
title;
16. Child sexual abuse material or aggravated child sexual
abuse material as provided for in Section 1021.2, 1021.3, 1024.1,
1024.2, or 1040.12a of this title;
17. Child sex trafficking as defined in Section 1030 of this
title;
18. Lewd molestation of a child as provided for in Section 1123
of this title;
19. Abuse of a vulnerable adult as defined in Section 10-103 of
Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. Aggravated trafficking as provided for in subsection C of
Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Aggravated assault and battery as provided for in Section
646 of this title upon any person defending another person from
assault and battery; or
22. Human trafficking as defined in Section 748 of this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2151 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

23. Accessory to murder in the first degree or accessory to
murder in the second degree as provided for in Section 175 of this
title; or
23. Discharging a firearm at or into a dwelling or building
used for public or business purposes, as provided for in Section
1289.17A of this title,
or any attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation thereof, shall be
required to serve not less than eighty-five percent (85%) of any
sentence of imprisonment imposed by the judicial system prior to
becoming eligible for consideration for parole unless the district
attorney lowers the minimum service requirement pursuant to
subsection B of this section. Persons convicted of these offenses
shall not be eligible for earned credits or any other type of
credits which have the effect of reducing the length of the sentence
to less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence imposed.
B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, the district
attorney, may at his or her discretion, file a notice with the court
at any time prior to final sentencing of the defendant stating for
any offense listed in subsection A of this section for which the
defendant is convicted, the defendant shall be required to serve not
less than sixty-five percent (65%) of any sentence of imprisonment
imposed by the judicial system prior to becoming eligible for
consideration for parole. Persons convicted of such offenses shall
not be eligible for earned credits or any other type of credits
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2151 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

whic h have the effect of reducing the length of the sentence to less
than sixty-five percent (65%) of the sentence imposed.
SECTION 2. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as
amended by Section 5, Chapter 59, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 13.1), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as last
amended by Section 2, Chapter 18, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 13.1), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as last
amended by Section 1, Chapter 352, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 13.1), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 24, 2026 - DO PASS











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2151 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)